Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2155
Utilities district; public offstreet motor vehicle parking facilities; location.

A metropolitan utilities district is hereby authorized to own, purchase, construct, equip, and operate public offstreet motor vehicle parking facilities on property owned or leased by such district within the area designated as the civic center by the city council in the master plan of a city of the metropolitan class. Such parking facilities shall be constructed upon land contiguous to the office or administrative headquarters of such district and shall be used in whole or in part in connection therewith.

Laws 1973, LB 577, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1116;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 55.